ext/liblouis/tables/translation/_translation_da-g2.ctb
# letter a
word af 356
word aldrig 1-35
word alle 1256
word allerede 1-123-1235
word alligevel 1-123-1236
word altid 1-2345-145
word altsâ 1-16
word altså 1-16
word at 1

# letter b
always bagefter 12-1-1245-15-124-2345-156
always betre 12-15-2345-12356
always betr 12-15-2345-1235
always betv 12-15-2345-1236
always bety 12-15-2345-12346
word blevet 12-2345
always blev 12-1236
word blive 12-3456
word bliver 12

# letter d
always denda 12346-145-1
always denden 12346-12346
always dender 12346-23456
always dendet 12346-2346
always dende 12346-1456
always dendi 12346-145-24
always dendo 12346-145-135
always dendu 12346-145-136
always dendy 12346-145-13456
always dendæ 12346-145-345
always dendâ 12346-145-16
always dendå 12346-145-16
always dendæ 12346-145-345
always dendæ 12346-145-345
always dendö 12346-145-246
always dendø 12346-145-246
always dend 1456-12345
always denend 1456-1246-12345
always denene 1456-1246-1246
always denen 1456-1345-126
always denere 1456-1246-12356
always dener 1456-1345-12345
always denete 1456-1246-1256
always denet 1456-1345-346
always dene 1456-1246
always deni 1456-1345-24
always denore 1456-1345-135-12356
always denor 1456-1345-1346
always deno 1456-1345-135
always denu 1456-1345-136
always deny 1456-1345-13456
always denæ 1456-1345-345
always denâ 1456-1345-16
always denå 1456-1345-345
always denå 1456-1345-16
always denæ 1456-1345-345
always denæ 1456-1345-345
always denö 1456-1345-246
always denø 1456-1345-246
always den 12346
always dera 1456-1235-1
word derefter 23456-1356
always derend 1456-12356-12345
always derene 1456-12356-1246
always deren 1456-1235-126
always derere 1456-12356-12356
always derer 1456-1235-156
word deres 256
always derete 1456-12356-1256
always deret 1456-1235-346
always dere 1456-12356
word derfor 23456-124
word derigennem 23456-24-12456
always derige 1456-1235-24-12456
always derig 1456-1235-35
always deri 1456-1235-24
word dermed 23456-134
word derned 23456-1246
word derop 23456-135
always deror 1456-1235-1346
word derover 23456-1346
always dero 1456-1235-135
word derpâ 23456-1234
word derpâ 23456-1234
word dersom 23456-234
word dertil 23456-2345
word derunder 23456-12345
always deru 1456-1235-136
word derved 23456-1236
always dery 1456-1235-13456
always deræ 1456-1235-345
always derâ 1456-1235-16
always derâ 1456-1235-345
always derå 1456-1235-16
always deræ 1456-1235-345
always deræ 1456-1235-345
always derö 1456-1235-246
always derø 1456-1235-246
always der 23456
always deta 1456-2345-1
always detend 1456-1256-12345
always detene 1456-1256-1246
always deten 1456-2345-126
always detere 1456-1256-12356
always deter 1456-2345-156
always detete 1456-1256-1256
always detet 1456-2345-346
always dete 1456-1256
always deti 1456-2345-24
always deto 1456-2345-135
always detu 1456-2345-136
always detæ 1456-2345-345
always detâ 1456-2345-16
always detâ 1456-2345-345
always detå 1456-2345-16
always detæ 1456-2345-345
always detæ 1456-2345-345
always detö 1456-2345-246
always detø 1456-2345-246
always det 2346
always de 1456
word din 145-1345
word disse 145-234
word dit 145-2345
always domskri =
always domsti =
word du 145
always dvo =

# letter e
word efter 1356
word eller 15
always ena 15-1345-1
always enda 126-145-1
always enden 126-12346
always ender 126-23456
always endet 126-2346
always ende 126-1456
always endi 126-145-24
word endnu 15-136
always endor 126-145-136
always endo 126-145-135
always endu 126-145-136
always endy 126-145-13456
always endæ 126-145-345
always endâ 126-145-16
always endâ 126-145-345
always endå 126-145-16
always endæ 126-145-345
always endæ 126-145-345
always endö 126-145-246
always endø 126-145-246
always end 15-12345
always enend 126-1246-145-246
always enene 15-1246-1246
always enen 15-1345-126
always enere 15-1246-12356
always ener 15-1345-156
always enete 15-1246-1256
always enet 15-1345-346
always ene 15-1246
always eni 15-1345-24
always enore 15-1345-135-12356
always enor 15-1345-1346
always eno =
always enu =
always eny =
always enæ 15-1345-345
always enâ 15-1345-16
always enâ 15-1345-345
always enå 15-1345-16
always enæ 15-1345-345
always enæ 15-1345-126
always enö 15-1345-246
always enø 15-1345-246
always en 126
always era =
always erend 15-12356-12345
always erenen 15-12356-1345-126
always erener 15-12356-1345-156
always erenet 15-12356-1345-346
always erene 15-12356-1246
always eren 15-1235-126
always erere 15-12356-12356
always erer 15-1235-156
always erete 15-12356-1256
always eret 15-1235-346
always ere 15-12356
always erige 15-1235-24-12456
always erig 15-1235-35
always eri =
always eror 15-1235-1346
always ero =
always eru =
always ery =
always erâ 15-1235-345
always erâ 15-1235-16
always eræ 15-1235-345
always eræ 15-1235-345
always erö 15-1235-246
always erø 15-1235-246
always er 156
always eta =
always etend 15-1256-12345
always etene 15-1256-1246
always eten 15-2345-126
always etere 15-1256-12356
always eter 15-2345-156
always etete 15-1256-1256
always etet 15-2345-346
always ete 15-1256
always eti =
always etj =
always etore 15-2345-135-12356
always etor 15-2345-1346
always eto =
always etu =
always ety =
always etæ 15-2345-345
always etâ 15-2345-345
always etâ 15-2345-345
always etâ 15-2345-345
always etæ 15-2345-345
always etæ 15-2345-345
always etö 15-2345-246
always etø 15-2345-246
always et 346

# letter f
word fik 124-13
word fordi 124-145
always forenen 124-1346-15-1345-126
always forener 124-1346-15-1345-156
always forenet 124-1346-15-1345-346
always forene 124-1346-15-1246
word forskellige 124-123456-15
word forskelligt 124-123456-2345
word forskellig 124-123456
always foru 124-1346-136
word for 145
word fra 235
always fremef 124-12356-134-15-124
word förste 124-1356-15
word först 124-1356
word för 246
word første 145-1356-15
word først 124-1356
word før 12456

# letter g
word ganske 1245-123456
always genda 1245-126-145-1
always genden 1245-126-12346
always gender 1245-126-23456
always gendet 1245-126-2346
always gende 1245-126-1456
always gendig 1245-126-145-35
always gendi 1245-126-145-24
always gendor 1245-126-145-1346
always gendo 1245-126-145-135
always gendu 1245-126-145-136
always gendæ 1245-126-145-345
always gendâ 1245-126-145-16
always gendâ 1245-126-145-345
always gendâ 1245-126-145-16
always gendæ 1245-126-145-345
always gendæ 1245-126-145-345
always gendö 1245-126-145-246
always gendø 1245-126-145-246
always gend 12456-12345
always genen 12456-1345-126
always genera 12456-1246-1235-1
always genere 12456-1246-12356
always generi 12456-1246-1235-24
always genero 12456-1246-1235-135
always generu 12456-1246-1235-136
always gener 12456-1345-156
always genet 12456-1345-346
always gene 12456-1246
always geni 12456-1345-24
word gennem 12456
always genop 1245-126-135-1234
always geno 12456-1345-135
always genu 12456-1345-136
always geny 12456-1345-13456
always genæ 12456-1345-345
always genâ 12456-1345-16
always genâ 12456-1345-345
always genâ 12456-1345-16
always genæ 12456-1345-345
always genæ 12456-1345-345
always genö 12456-1345-246
always genø 12456-1345-246
always gen 1245-126
always geren 12456-1235-126
always gerer 12456-1235-156
always geret 12456-1235-346
always gere 12456-1246
always geri 12456-1235-24
always gero 12456-1235-135
always geru 12456-1235-136
always gery 12456-1235-13456
always geræ 12456-1235-345
always gerâ 12456-1235-16
always gerâ 12456-1235-345
always gerâ 12456-1235-16
always geræ 12456-1235-345
always geræ 12456-1235-345
always gerö 12456-1235-246
always gerø 12456-1235-246
always ger 1245-156
always geten 12456-2345-126
always geter 12456-2345-156
always getet 12456-2345-346
always gete 12456-1256
always geti 12456-24
always geto 12456-135
always getu 12456-136
always gety 12456-13456
always getæ 12456-345
always getâ 12456-16
always getâ 12456-345
always getâ 12456-16
always getæ 12456-345
always getæ 12456-345
always getö 12456-246
always getø 12456-246
always get 1245-346
always ge 12456
word gik 1245-13
always grundele 1245-1235-136-12345-15-123-15
word gör 1245
word gør 1245

# letter h
word ham 236
word hans 13456-234
word han 13456
word har 125
word havde 125-1456
word have 125-3456
word helt 125-2345
word hendes 125-234
word hende 125-145
always heref 125-156-15-124
always herom 125-156-135-134
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
always hven 2456-126
always hver 2456-156
always hvet 2456-346
always hve 2456-15
word hvis 2456-234
always hvor/hvornâr 34-6-34-34-1345
always hvor/ 34-6-34
word hvordan 34-1
word hvorefter 34-1356
word hvorfor 34-124
word hvorigennem 34-24-12456
word hvorledes 34-15
word hvormed 34-134
word hvornâr 34-1345
word hvornâr 34-1345
word hvorover 34-1346
word hvorpâ 34-1234
word hvorpâ 34-1234
word hvortil 34-2345
word hvorunder 34-12345
word hvorved 34-1236
always hvor 34
always hv 2456

# letter i
always iga 24-1245-1
word igennemi 24-12456
word igen 35
always igen 24-1245-126
always iger 24-1245-156
always iget 24-1245-346
always ige 24-12456
always igig 24-1245-35
always igi =
always igore 24-1245-135-12356
always igor 24-1245-1346
always igo =
always igu =
always igy =
always igæ 24-1245-345
always igâ 24-1245-16
always igâ 25-1245-345
always igâ 25-1245-16
always igæ 25-1245-345
always igæ 25-1245-345
always igö 25-1245-246
always igø 25-1245-246
always ig 35
word ikke 24-13
word imidlertid 24-24
always ingsti =

# letter j
word jeg 245

# letter k
word kan 13
always karaktereg 13-1-1235-1-13-234-156-15-1245
always kendete 13-126-1456-1256
word kommer 13-156
word kommet 13-346
word komme 13-146
word kom 13-134
word kunne 13-1246

# letter l
word ligesom 123-234
word lige 123
word lille 123-123
always lösköb 123-246-234-13-246-12
always løskøb 123-246-234-13-246-12

# letter m
word mange 134-12456
word med 134
word megen 146-126
word meget 146-346
always mellemö 146-123-123-15-134-246
always mellemø 146-123-123-15-134-246
word mellem 146-134
always mena 146-1345-1
always menda 134-126-145-1
always menden 134-126-12346
always mender 134-126-23456
always mendet 134-126-2346
always mende 134-126-1456
always mendig 134-126-145-35
always mendi 134-126-145-24
always mendor 134-126-145-1346
always mendo 134-126-145-135
always mendu 134-126-145-136
always mendæ 134-126-145-345
always mendâ 134-126-145-16
always mendâ 134-126-145-345
always mendâ 134-126-145-16
always mendæ 134-126-145-345
always mendæ 134-126-145-345
always mendö 134-126-145-246
always mendø 134-126-145-246
always mend 146-12345
always menen 146-1345-126
always mener 146-1345-156
always menet 146-1345-346
always mene 146-1246
always meni 146-1345-24
always meno 146-1345-135
always menu 146-1345-136
always meny 146-1345-13456
always menæ 146-1456-345
always menâ 146-1456-16
always menâ 146-1456-345
always menâ 146-1456-16
always menæ 146-1456-345
always menæ 146-1456-345
always menö 146-1456-246
always menø 146-1456-246
word men 146
always men 134-126
always mera 146-1235-1
always meren 146-1235-126
always merer 146-1235-156
always meret 146-1235-346
always mere 146-12356
always meri 146-1235-24
always mero 146-1235-135
always meru 146-1235-136
always mery 146-1235-13456
always meræ 146-1235-345
always merâ 146-1235-16
always merâ 146-1235-345
always merâ 146-1235-16
always meræ 146-1235-345
always meræ 146-1235-345
always merö 146-1235-246
always merø 146-1235-246
always mer 134-156
always meta 146-2345-1
always meten 146-2345-126
always meter 146-2345-156
always metet 146-2345-346
always mete 146-1256
always meti 146-2345-24
always meto 146-2345-135
always metu 146-2345-136
always mety 146-2345-13456
always metæ 146-2345-345
always metâ 146-2345-16
always metâ 146-2345-345
always metâ 146-2345-16
always metæ 146-2345-345
always metæ 146-2345-345
always metö 146-2345-246
always metø 146-2345-246
always met 145-346
always me 146
word min 146-1345
always miskre 134-24-234-13-12356
word mit 134-2345
word mâske 134-123456
word mâtte 134-1256
word mâske 134-123456
word mâtte 134-1256
